Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 5. Physicians Assistants

§ 33-26-501.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 81, § 3.

“License” means a license to practice medicine as a physician assistant in this state;

“Physician assistant” means any person who:

Graduates from a physician assistant education program approved by CAAHEP or its predecessor or successor agency;

Satisfactorily completes a certification examination administered by NCCPA or other national physician assistant certifying agency established for such purposes which has been reviewed and approved by the board, and is currently certified;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 81, § 3.

“Certification examination” means the initial certifying examination approved by the board for the certification of physician assistants including, but not limited to, the examination administered by NCCPA or other national physician assistant certifying agency established for such purpose which has been reviewed and approved by the board;

through (vii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 81, § 3.

“CAAHEP” means the commission on accreditation of allied health education programs;

“CAHEA” means the committee on allied health education and accreditation;

“NCCPA” means the national commission on the certification of physician assistants.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-338.1; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-118; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 201, § 1; 2021 ch. 81, §§ 2, 3, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “a board-approved physician assistant” for “an approved physician assistant” in (a)(v)(A); and added “when acting in the absence of the supervising physician” at the end of (a)(v)(B).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2021 amendment,

by ch. 81, §§ 2, 3, effective January 1, 2022, added "medicine" following "practice"; repealed (a)(i), "'Back-up physician' means a physician designated by the supervising physician to ensure supervision of the physician assistant in the supervising physician’s absence. A back-up physician is subject to the same requirements imposed upon the supervising physician if the back-up physician is acting as a supervising physician"; repealed (a)(v), which read, "'Supervising physician' means a: (A) Board-approved physician who utilizes and agrees to be responsible for the medical acts of a board-approved physician assistant; or (B) Back-up physician when acting in the absence of the supervising physician"; repealed (a)(vi), which read, "'Supervision' means the ready availability of the supervising physician for consultation and direction of the activities of the physician assistant. Contact with the supervising physician by telecommunications is sufficient to show ready availability, if the board finds that such contact is sufficient to provide quality medical care"; and repealed (a)(vii), which read, "'Assists' means the physician assistant may perform those duties and responsibilities delegated to him by his supervising physician without the supervising physician being physically present."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-26-502.
Scope of W.S. 33-26-501 through 33-26-511; signature authority.

This article does not apply to persons enrolled in a physician assistant education program.

A physician assistant is an individual who practices medicine. A physician assistant is qualified by the individual’s education, training and experience to provide a broad range of diagnostic, therapeutic and health promotion and disease prevention services. A physician assistant may collaborate with or refer to the appropriate member of a healthcare team as indicated by the condition of the patient and the education, experience and competence of the physician assistant and current standard of care. The degree of collaboration shall be determined at the practice level, which may include decisions made by the employer, group, hospital service or the credentialing and privileging systems.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to conflict with or alter the provisions and requirements of W.S.

33-26-101

through

33-26-410

and

33-26-601

et seq.

Except as otherwise provided by law and including the restriction in W.S. 33-26-510(c), a physician assistant may fulfill any requirement for a signature, certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, endorsement or other acknowledgement by a physician.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-338.8; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-125; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2001, ch. 166, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 3; 2009, ch. 201, § 1; 2020 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 81, § 2, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

added “and

33-26-601

et seq.” at the end of (d).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (e).

The 2021 amendment,

effective January 1, 2022, in (a), added "education" and deleted "approved by the board" at the end; rewrote (b), which read, "A physician assistant assists in the practice of medicine under the supervision of a licensed physician. Within the physician/physician assistant relationship, physician assistants exercise autonomy in medical decision making and provide a broad range of diagnostic, therapeutic and health promotion and disease prevention services. The physician assistant may perform those duties and responsibilities delegated to him by the supervising physician when the duties and responsibilities are provided under the supervision of a licensed physician approved by the board, within the scope of the physician’s practice and expertise and within the skills of the physician assistant"; in (e), deleted "acting within the scope of the physician assistant's practice" following "physician assistant" and deleted the former last sentence, which read, "Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of a physician assistant as provided in this article or to expand the duties and responsibilities delegated to a physician assistant by the physician assistant's supervising physician."

§ 33-26-503.
Board powers and duties.

The board shall pass upon the qualifications and determine the fitness of all persons desiring to practice as physician assistants.

The board shall:

Grant, refuse to grant, revoke and reinstate licenses;

Investigate allegations that a physician assistant has engaged in conduct constituting a ground for revocation in W.S.

33-26-402

or

33-26-508

;

Conduct informal interviews and contested cases;

Promulgate regulations governing the practice of physician assistants;

Appoint members to serve on an advisory committee to the board of medicine. A majority of the members of the advisory committee shall be physician assistants. The committee members are responsible to and shall serve at the board’s pleasure. The advisory committee shall review and make recommendations to the board regarding all matters relating to physician assistants that come before the board, including but not be limited to:

Applications for licensure;

Physician assistant education;

Scope of practice;

Licensure requirements;

Continuing medical education.

Retain jurisdiction over only those licensees to whom temporary or full licenses were granted, regardless of whether the license expired, lapsed or was relinquished during or after the alleged occurrence of conduct proscribed in W.S.

33-26-508

by the licensee;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 81, § 3.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 33-338.2, 33-338.4; W.S. 1977, §§ 33-26-119, 33-26-121; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 201, § 1; 2021 ch. 81, §§ 2, 3, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

added (b)(vii).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2021 amendment,

by ch. 81, §§ 2, 3, effective January 1, 2022, deleted "or his supervising physician" following "physician assistant" in (b)(ii); in the second sentence of (b)(v), substituted "A majority" for "At least two (2)," added "of the advisory committee," deleted "and two (2) members shall be physicians" at the end; and repealed (b)(vii), which read, "Pass upon the qualifications and ability of physicians desiring to serve as a supervising physician or back-up physician including, but not limited to, the compatibility of the supervising physician’s or back-up physician’s specialty and scope of practice with that of the physician assistant to be supervised."

§ 33-26-504.
License required; application; qualifications; consideration of applications.

No person shall practice as a physician assistant or represent oneself as a physician assistant without a license granted by the board.

The board may grant a physician assistant license to an applicant who:

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Has graduated from a physician assistant program accredited by CAAHEP or its predecessor or successor organization;

Has satisfactorily completed a certification examination administered by NCCPA or other national certifying agency established for such purposes which has been reviewed and approved by the board and is currently certified;

Completes an application form; and

Pays the fees set forth in W.S.

33-26-507

.

The board may issue a temporary license to any person who successfully completes a CAAHEP or other board approved program for the education and training of a physician assistant but has not passed a certification examination. To allow the opportunity to take the next available certification examination, any temporary license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be issued for a period not to exceed one (1) year and under conditions as the board determines pursuant to W.S.

33-26-505

. The board may adopt rules to ensure that persons receiving a temporary license under this subsection are supervised by a physician assistant with not less than five (5) years of licensed experience who is approved by the board or by a physician who is approved by the board.

Physician assistants approved by the board prior to the effective date of this act are not required to be currently certified by the NCCPA. Graduation from a CAHEA approved program is considered equivalent to a CAAHEP program for purposes of licensure.

through (g) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 81, § 3.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-338.3; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-120; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 61, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, § 1; 2021 ch. 81, §§ 2, 3, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence in (f); added (g); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted the present last two sentences of (f) for the former last sentence which read: “It shall be the policy of the board to allow at least three (3) physician assistants per physician and the board and the advisory committee shall not deny an application due to the number of physician assistants supervised up to at least three (3), except for good cause specific to the circumstances of that individual physician”; and substituted “may provide by rule for” for “may allow” in (g).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2021 amendment,

by ch. 81, §§ 2, 3, effective January 1, 2022, substituted "oneself as" for "that he is"; added the last sentence in (c); and repealed (e), which read, "The board shall formulate guidelines for consideration of applications by a licensed physician to supervise physician assistants. Any application shall include: (i) The qualifications of the physician assistant to be employed, including experience; (ii) The professional background of the physician, including specialty; (iii) A description by the physician of his practice and the way in which the physician assistant will be utilized, including method of supervision"; repealed (f), which read, "The board, with the concurrence of the advisory committee, shall approve an application by a licensed physician to supervise physician assistants if the board is satisfied that each proposed physician assistant is a graduate of an approved program, has satisfactorily completed a certification examination and is fully qualified to assist in the practice of medicine under the responsible supervision of a licensed physician. The board shall provide by rule for requirements and limitations on the practice by and supervision of physician assistants. However, a physician shall be limited to the supervision of three (3) or fewer physician assistants only for good cause specific to the circumstances of that individual physician"; and repealed (g), which read, "The board may provide by rule for arrangements for other physicians to serve as back up or on call physicians for multiple physician assistants."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-26-102(a)(xxi).

§ 33-26-505.
Temporary license.

The board may grant a temporary license to practice as a physician assistant to a person who:

Completes a temporary license application;

Meets the requirements of W.S. 33-26-504(b); and

Pays the temporary license fee prescribed in W.S.

33-26-507

.

A temporary license is valid until the next board meeting following the date of issuance. The board may extend the temporary license at its discretion upon a showing of good cause for a period not to exceed one (1) year from the original date of issuance of the temporary license.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

in (b), deleted “but not to exceed one (1) year” at the end of the first sentence, and, in the last sentence, substituted “temporary license” for “license” and added “for a period not to exceed one (1) year from the original date of issuance of the temporary license” at the end.

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

§ 33-26-506.
Term of license; renewal; duplicates.

All licenses other than temporary licenses expire annually on December 31. A physician assistant may renew his license by completing and submitting a renewal application form published by the board and renewal fee to the board prior to expiration of his current license.

The board may reinstate a lapsed license if the applicant pays a reinstatement fee and meets the requirements for the granting of an initial license.

A physician assistant may apply to the board for a duplicate license if his license is stolen, lost or destroyed. Upon proof of proper identification and submission of such other information as the board may require, the board shall issue a duplicate license bearing on its face the word “DUPLICATE” and establish and require payment of appropriate charges for a duplicate license.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 201, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “completing and submitting a renewal application form published by” for “sending his signature, current address, practice related information requested by” in (a).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

§ 33-26-507.
License fees.

The board shall, by regulation set appropriate license application, renewal and reactivation fees, examination fees and fees for information verification or document production and other services of the board to be charged under this chapter.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Fees shall be deposited as provided in W.S. 33-26-307(b).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-338.6; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-123; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3.

§ 33-26-508.
Suspension, restriction, revocation or nonrenewal of license.

The board may refuse to renew, and may revoke, suspend or restrict a license or take other disciplinary action, including the imposition of conditions or restrictions upon a license on one (1) or more of the grounds enumerated under W.S.

33-26-402

provided that each reference in W.S.

33-26-402

(a) to the “practice of medicine,” “practice medicine,” or like phrase shall be deemed the “practice as a physician assistant” for purposes of this section.

through (viii) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Upon a finding of ineligibility for licensure, refusal to grant, suspension, restriction, refusal to renew or revocation of a license under subsection (a) of this section, the board shall adopt and enter its written order and findings.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 132, § 2; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2021 ch. 81, § 2, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendment,

effective January 1, 2022, deleted "(a)(i) through (x), (xii) and (xiv) through (xxxiv)" following "W.S.

33-26-402

" in (a).

§ 33-26-509.
Reinstatement.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any person whose license has been revoked, restricted or suspended under this chapter, voluntarily or by action of the board, may petition for reinstatement of his license or for removal of any restrictions or conditions placed upon his license pursuant to W.S.

33-26-508

not less than six (6) months after final judicial review of a board order revoking, restricting or suspending the petitioner’s license or six (6) months after the date of the board order if there is no judicial review or six (6) months after the date of the board agreement to accept a relinquished, restricted or conditioned license. The petitioner shall submit a written petition to the board that, at a minimum, sets forth and provides information regarding the petitioner’s fulfillment of any and all conditions or compliance with all restrictions imposed upon petitioner by any prior order of the board or success in correcting the conduct that formed the basis for revocation of petitioner’s license.

If a license is suspended under W.S. 33-26-508(d), the license may be reinstated without a hearing as provided in this section upon receipt from the department of family services of notice that the applicant has complied with the terms of the court order that resulted in the suspension or restriction of the license under W.S. 33-26-508(d).

The burden of proof upon the petitioner at the hearing shall be to demonstrate, by a preponderance of evidence, that:

Petitioner has corrected the conduct that formed the basis for the revocation of petitioner’s license and that petitioner is able to safely, skillfully and competently resume practice as a physician assistant; or

Petitioner has fulfilled all conditions or complied with all restrictions imposed upon petitioner by any prior order of the board, has otherwise corrected the conduct or condition which formed the basis for the restrictions or conditions placed on petitioner’s license and that petitioner is able to safely, skillfully and competently practice as a physician assistant in this state.

Upon receipt of a petition that contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section, the board shall set the matter for a contested case hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

After a hearing conducted pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the board shall issue specific findings of facts, conclusions of law and a final order:

Reinstating the license;

Reinstating the license subject to restrictions or conditions;

Removing or modifying the restrictions or conditions of the license; or

Denying reinstatement of the license or removal of the restrictions or conditions on the license.

Any final order issued by the board shall be subject to judicial review as provided for by W.S.

33-26-407

.

If the board denies a reinstatement or removal of restrictions or conditions, future petitions for reinstatement or removal of restrictions or conditions may be submitted not less than one (1) year after the board’s final order denying reinstatement or removal of restrictions or conditions.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2003, ch. 190, § 2.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-26-510.
Prescription of drugs.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 132, § 2.

A physician assistant shall not prescribe schedule I drugs as defined by W.S.

35-7-1013

through

35-7-1014

. A physician assistant may prescribe schedule II, III, IV or V drugs as defined by W.S.

35-7-1015

through

35-7-1022

. A physician assistant may dispense prepackaged medications in rural clinics when pharmacy services are not physically available. The board shall, after consultation with the state board of pharmacy, promulgate rules and regulations governing the prescription of medications by a physician assistant.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 132, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 166, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2021 ch. 81, § 2, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendment,

effective January 1, 2022, rewrote (c), which read, "A physician assistant may prescribe medications only as an agent of the supervising physician. A physician assistant may not prescribe schedule I drugs as defined by W.S.

35-7-1013

through

35-7-1014

. The supervising physician may delegate authority to the physician assistant to dispense prepackaged medications in rural clinics when pharmacy services are not physically available. The board shall, after consultation with the state board of pharmacy, promulgate rules and regulations governing the prescription of medications by a physician assistant."

§ 33-26-511.
Penalties.

Any person practicing as a physician assistant or representing that he is a physician assistant without a license or any person employing an unlicensed person to practice as a physician assistant is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both. Each violation constitutes a separate offense for which the penalty in this section may be assessed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-338.7; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-124; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Medical malpractice: Who are “health care providers,” or the like, whose actions fall within statutes specifically governing actions and damages for medical malpractice, 12 ALR5th 1.

§ 33-26-512.
Voluntary and mandatory revocation; restriction; suspension.

A licensee may request the board, in writing, to accept the voluntary relinquishment, restriction or suspension of his license. The board may, but shall not be required to accept the relinquished license, grant the request for restriction or suspension, attach conditions to the license or waive the commencement of any proceedings under this article. The board shall put in writing any agreement with the licensee. Removal of a voluntary relinquishment, restriction or suspension is subject to the procedure for reinstatement of a license pursuant to W.S.

33-26-509

.

Unless the board and the licensee have agreed to the relinquishment of or imposition of restrictions or conditions on a license, the board shall conduct a proceeding to suspend, restrict, refuse to renew or revoke a license pursuant to W.S. 33-26-508(a) as a contested case under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The board may temporarily suspend the license of any licensee without a hearing pursuant to W.S. 16-3-113(c).

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-26-513.
Advertising and display of license requirement.

Any advertisement for health care services that names a person practicing medicine as a physician assistant shall identify the license held under this article. The advertisement shall be free from deceptive or misleading information.

A person practicing medicine as a physician assistant shall conspicuously post and affirmatively communicate to the patient the license held under this article. Posting and communication shall include:

Wearing a photo identification name tag during all patient encounters. The name tag shall:

Include a recent photograph of the licensed physician assistant;

Include the license holder’s name;

Include the license held under this article;

Be of a sufficient size for a patient to read the contents of the name tag; and

Be worn in a conspicuous manner so as to be visible and apparent to the patient.

Displaying in a conspicuous place in the office wherein the practice of medicine is conducted a license certificate or other writing issued by the board that clearly identifies the license held under this article. The certificate or other writing shall be of sufficient size so as to be visible and apparent to all current and prospective patients;

Compliance with these posting and communication requirements in each practice setting.

A person practicing medicine as a physician assistant and working in a setting that does not involve direct patient care interaction is not subject to the posting and communication requirements in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

2021 ch. 81, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 81, § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2022.